Utah statutes.
76-6-104.5.   Abandoned fire -- Penalties.

(1)  A person is guilty of abandoning a fire if, under circumstances not amounting to the offense of arson, aggravated arson, or causing a catastrophe under Title 76, Chapter 6, Part 1, Property Destruction, the person leaves a fire:

(a)  without first completely extinguishing it; and

(b)  with the intent to not return to the fire.

(2)  A person does not commit a violation of Subsection (1) if the person leaves a fire to report an uncontrolled fire.

(3)  A violation of Subsection (1):

(a)  is a class C misdemeanor if there is no property damage;

(b)  is a class B misdemeanor if property damage is less than $1,000 in value; and

(c)  is a class A misdemeanor if property damage is or exceeds $1,000 in value.

(4)  If a violation of Subsection (1) involves a wildland fire, the violator is also liable for suppression costs under Section 65A-3-4.

(5)  A fire spreading or reigniting is prima facie evidence that the person did not completely extinguish the fire as required by Subsection (1)(a).

